Utah statutes.
78B-6-139.   Name and status of adopted child.

When a final decree of adoption is entered under Section 78B-6-137, a child may take the family name of the adoptive parent or parents.  After that decree of adoption is entered, the adoptive parent or parents and the child shall sustain the legal relationship of parent and child, and have all the rights and be subject to all the duties of that relationship.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

